California, session 20252026, SB1128.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 60077 is added to the Education Code, immediately following Section 60076, to read:60077. (a) Commencing with the 2027–28 school year, a local educational agency shall not require, but may authorize, a pupil in kindergarten to take home a school-issued electronic device. device unless the device is necessary under one of the following circumstances:(1) Pursuant to a pupil’s individualized education program, as defined in Section 56032.(2) In the case of a local or state emergency that interferes with the ability of a pupil to attend class in person, as determined by the local educational agency.(3) Pursuant to an independent study program established pursuant to Article 5.5 (commencing with Section 51745) of Chapter 5 of Part 28.(b) Local educational agencies are encouraged to regularly review and update their policies related to pupils’ screen time, including time spent on electronic devices in the classroom and completing homework, and providing pupils with school-issued devices for these purposes. In conducting a review, local educational agencies are encouraged to solicit input from currently employed teachers and school administrators, parents and guardians of enrolled pupils, enrolled pupils, and any other stakeholder groups deemed relevant, and are encouraged to consider all of the following in the review:(1) Appropriate policies for each grade level.(2) One-time and ongoing financial costs of providing pupils with take-home school-issued electronic devices.(3) The ability of the local educational agency to provide ongoing technological support of school-issued electronic devices.(4) The ability of the local educational agency to monitor and control pupil activity on school-issued electronic devices when they are used at home.(5) The educational benefits and risks of pupils completing homework on electronic devices rather than through other methods.(6) The equity implications of providing or not providing all pupils with take-home school-issued electronic devices.(7) The safety risks to pupils when completing homework on school-issued electronic devices, or other electronic devices, including data privacy concerns, exposure to harmful content, and developmental impacts.(b)(c) On or before July 1, 2027, the department shall develop do both of the following:(1) Develop and post on its internet website model policies for the age-appropriate use of school-issued electronic devices in schools. In developing the model policies, the department shall take into consideration all of the following:(1)(A) Developmentally appropriate screen exposure time. time at each grade level.(2)(B) Balancing pupils’ use of school-issued electronic devices with direct teacher interaction.(3)(C) The impact of school-issued electronic devices on early literacy, arithmetic, and fine motor skill development.(2) Provide guidance and resources to five or more local educational agencies that elect to participate in a pilot to remove take-home school-issued electronic devices from pupils, which may include, but not be limited to, all of the following:(A) Guidance on how to transition take-home school-issued electronic devices into dedicated classroom-based electronic devices, or how to participate in e-waste recycling or buy-back programs.(B) Procurement pathways or grant opportunities to purchase classroom charging carts for existing electronic devices.(C) Model policies or examples of offline homework design for use by educators.(D) Targeted professional development on engaging pupils through nonelectronic methods.(E) A template for communications to explain policy shifts for distribution to local educational agency staff, parents or guardians of enrolled pupils, and enrolled pupils.(F) A template for responsible use policies that define pupil expectations for classroom-based electronic device care.(c)(d) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Electronic device” means a desktop or laptop computer, handheld device, tablet, smartphone, or other electronic product or device that has a platform on which to download, install, or run any software program, code, script, or other content.(2) “Kindergarten” includes transitional kindergarten, as defined in Section 48000.(3) “Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.